Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ST. LOUIS PARK; WAYZATA AND ZARTHAN AREA INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,050,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 174.50, for a grant to the city of St. Louis Park to acquire property or interests in property, predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip improvements to Wayzata Boulevard from Louisiana Avenue to Zarthan Avenue, Zarthan Avenue from Wayzata Boulevard to a point 200 feet south of 16th Street, 16th Street from Zarthan Avenue to Park Place Boulevard. This appropriation includes money for area trail and sidewalk construction; replacement or repair of water, sewer, and storm sewer facilities; and other improvements or upgrades related to street reconstruction work including streetlights, signals, striping, and signs; replacement or repair of pavement, curb, and gutter; and roundabout construction. This appropriation is available when the commissioner of management and budget determines that sufficient resources have been committed to complete the project, as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.502. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,050,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end